Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1541YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 47 Section 1. Section 22.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. a. A booking photograph. However, a 3 booking photograph may be released, published, or disseminated 4 for any of the following reasons: 5 (1) The person in the booking photograph is a fugitive and 6 a law enforcement agency or prosecuting agency determines that 7 the release and publication of the booking photograph will 8 assist in apprehending the person. 9 (2) A law enforcement agency or prosecuting agency 10 determines that the person in the booking photograph is an 11 imminent threat to an individual or to public safety and that 12 the release and publication of the booking photograph will 13 assist in reducing or eliminating the threat. 14 (3) A judge orders the release or publication of the booking 15 photograph based on a finding that the release or publication 16 furthers a legitimate interest. 17 (4) The person in the booking photograph has been convicted 18 or has pled guilty to a criminal offense for which the person 19 was arrested. 20 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbooking photographâ 21 means a photograph or still, nonvideo image of a person 22 generated by a law enforcement agency for identification 23 purposes after an arrest or while the person is in the custody 24 of the law enforcement agency. 25